Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.902

Effective date—2014 c 37.

This act takes effect January 5, 2015. The director of financial institutions may immediately take such steps as are necessary to ensure that this act is implemented on its effective date.

[ 2014 c 37 s 5.]